Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB473.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(i) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1302. Applications for Official Absentee Ballots.--* * *(i) * * *(1.1) No private organization or individual, other than the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 Secretary of the Commonwealth, may send an application for an absentee ballot to a qualified registered elector by mail or electronic means.* * *Section 2. Section 1302-D(f) and (g) of the act are amended to read:Section 1302-D. Applications for official mail-in ballots.* * *(f) Form.--(1) Application for an official mail-in ballot shall be on physical and electronic forms prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The application shall state that a voter who applies for a mail-in ballot under section 1301-D shall not be eligible to vote at a polling place on election day unless the elector brings the elector's mail-in ballot to the elector's polling place, remits the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections to be spoiled and signs a statement subject to the penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) to the same effect.(2) The physical application forms shall be made freely available to the public at county board of elections, municipal buildings and at other locations designated by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The electronic application forms shall be made freely available to the public through publicly accessible means. No written application or personal request shall be necessary to receive or access the application forms.(3) No private organization or individual, other than the Secretary of the Commonwealth, may send an application 20250HB0473PN0456 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for an official mail-in ballot to an elector by mail or electronic means.(4) Copies and records of all completed physical and electronic applications for official mail-in ballots shall be retained by the county board of elections.(g) Permanent mail-in voting list.--(1) [Any] All qualified registered [elector may request to] electors shall be placed on a permanent mail-in ballot list file at any time during the calendar year. A mail-in ballot application shall be mailed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth to every person otherwise eligible to receive a mail-in ballot application by the first Monday in February each year or within 48 hours of receipt [of the request] and approval of an application for voter registration, whichever is later, so long as the person does not lose the person's voting rights by failure to vote as otherwise required by this act. A mail-in ballot application mailed to an elector under this section, which is completed and timely returned by the elector, shall serve as an application for any and all primary, general or special elections to be held in the remainder of that calendar year and for all special elections to be held before the third Monday in February of the succeeding year.(1.1) A qualified registered elector shall be removed from the permanent mail-in voter list file upon the request of the qualified registered elector.(2) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may develop an electronic system through which all qualified electors may apply for a mail-in ballot and request permanent mail-in voter status under this section, provided the system is able 20250HB0473PN0456 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to capture a digitized or electronic signature of the applicant.(2.1) A county board of elections shall treat an application or request received through the electronic system as if the application or request had been submitted on a paper form or any other format used by the county.[(3) The transfer of a qualified registered elector on a permanent mail-in voting list from one county to another county shall only be permitted upon the request of the qualified registered elector.]Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0473PN0456 - 4 - 1234567891011